test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-naver_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - naver: # 2A
    naver+N+Sg+Nom: naṿer
    naver+N+Sg+Gen: nahhaar
    naver+N+Sg+Acc: nahhaar
    naver+N+Sg+Ill: naḥarân
    naver+N+Sg+Loc: naḥarist
    naver+N+Sg+Com: naḥaráin
    naver+N+Sg+Abe: nahhaarttáá
    naver+N+Ess: naṿerin
    naver+N+Par: naṿerid
    naver+N+Pl+Nom: naḥareh
    naver+N+Pl+Gen: naḥarij
    naver+N+Pl+Acc: naḥarijd
    naver+N+Pl+Ill: naḥaráid
    naver+N+Pl+Loc: naḥarijn
    naver+N+Pl+Com: naḥarijguin
    naver+N+Pl+Abe: naḥarijttáá
